epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/sv.xml
	<patterns>
		.a4b
		.ab5i
		.ab5ol
		.ab3r
		.ac3
		.a4d
		.a3dr
		.ad3s
		.a5g4ra
		.a5gre
		.a5kl
		.a5le
		.al4pr
		.a3lu
		.am4br
		.amp3l
		.a5mu
		.and4rar
		.a2n5es
		.ang4er
		.an5go
		.an5s
		.ap1p
		.as2k
		.a3sket
		.as4t
		.a5sten
		.a3sti
		.a5ta
		.at3t
		.au3st
		.a4val
		.av3s4
		.b4
		.bak5s
		.ben5s
		.bild3s
		.bo2k
		.bort1
		.cis4
		.cy5klop
		.d4
		.där3
		.ek1v
		.e3l4a
		.e2l5in
		.en5st
		.e4nä
		.e2r3i
		.e2s
		.e5skad
		.es3kal
		.es5kap
		.es4t
		.e5strad
		.e3tr
		.evan5
		.ex3
		.f4
		.feb3r
		.fram3
		.fres5
		.fågel3
		.för1a
		.för1en
		.g2
		.gu4lä
		.gus3
		.he2m
		.hu5sa
		.ib4
		.ik4
		.im3p
		.i2n1
		.i4na
		.in3d
		.in4ger
		.ink2
		.in3s2
		.in3t
		.is5ka
		.i3so
		.k4
		.kans4k
		.ko5li
		.kort5s
		.kring3
		.krings2
		.köp5s
		.l2
		.lak5r
		.lek5tr
		.lu2st
		.m2
		.mas2ke
		.ma5skeri
		.me4re
		.minis4
		.mjölk5s
		.mon2s
		.mån3s
		.må4st
		.män5sko
		.mörk5r
		.n4
		.ner1
		.no4n
		.nöd5r
		.oc1ku
		.ok3t
		.o3kv
		.o2ma
		.o2mo
		.om3s4
		.o3mu
		.on4k
		.o3o
		.ord3s
		.o5sc
		.o1s4k
		.o3sl
		.o3stra
		.o3sv
		.o3tr
		.o1u
		.p4
		.papp5s
		.pa3ste
		.pa5sti
		.pi5sti
		.pres2s
		.pub3lika
		.r2
		.re4gr
		.re2ste
		.runs4
		.rym2d
		.röve5
		.s4
		.sa2k
		.seg3r
		.si5o
		.sjö1
		.sk4
		.skott3s
		.slut3s
		.st4
		.sta2m
		.sten3s
		.string4
		.sup3p
		.t4
		.ta3bl
		.ta4k
		.tak5l
		.tes3ta
		.tig3r
		.til4l
		.ti3o
		.topp5s
		.tred2s
		.tre3s
		.trä5k
		.u3k
		.ult5r
		.ung2e
		.up2
		.u4ra
		.ur3s
		.u2t1
		.u4ta
		.u5trer
		.ut5s
		.v2
		.var4t
		.vatten3
		.ved5s
		.vä2g
		.väg3s
		.x2
		.y2a
		.y4e
		.ång3
		.år4s5
		.å3st
		.åter1
		.ä3ro
		.ö3ro
		a2b
		ab4bu
		a5be
		abel4s
		abe2s
		ab1l
		ab3la
		ab3ort
		ab5ric
		ab3rio
		ab4sc
		ab4sk
		a5bu
		ac4kes
		ac4kis
		ack3sk
		ack3u4p
		a5dag
		a5dek
		a5del
		ad5ep
		ad3j
		ad3op
		a5dran
		a3dre
		1adres
		ad3ril
		ad3ru
		ad2s
		a5ed
		af4fo
		3affä
		1af3ri
		af4tor
		a1ga
		aga4ra
		a1ge
		a2ge.
		ag1gr
		ag1l
		ag5ord
		ag3ro
		a4gur
		a4hj
		aib4
		a3iv
		a1j
		a3ka
		a4kart
		a5ke
		a1ki
		ak3n
		a1ko
		ak5ram
		akri5s
		ak3rob
		ak4sta
		1aktig
		ak3tri
		a1ku
		a5kvari
		ak3ve
		a5kår
		ak5åt
		4akö
		a1la
		al5adm
		ali2br
		a2lin
		a5lin.
		a3line
		al3ins
		ali5stik
		a4lj
		alk3ak
		al2kv
		al4kä
		all3st
		al3lå
		alms4k
		a1lo
		al5ort
		als5pa
		al3tr
		al4tu
		al4tä
		a1lu
		alu5s
		alv3s
		a1ly
		a4maf
		am4i
		am4pr
		am1s
		am3åt
		a3mö
		ana4bo
		an3alf
		an3ark
		an3c
		anci5
		an5dak
		andel2s
		an4dun
		an4dän
		a4nef
		ang4es
		an3gi
		an1gr
		aniu4
		ank3r
		ano2i
		a4nok
		a4nop
		an5sce
		ansis3t
		an4sj
		ans5ku
		ans3li
		ans3par
		an1st
		an4sto
		an4sty
		1ansvar
		an4tj
		an4tre
		a1nu
		a5ny
		a3nö
		a1o
		a1pe
		a2pe.
		ape4n3
		a1pi
		ap4lan
		apo3str
		1appara
		apps4k
		ap3ric
		ap3rif
		a5pris
		ap2s
		ap3se
		aps5l
		aps3p
		apu5s
		a5py
		a5pä
		2ara
		a4rann
		a4rarv
		1arb
		4arbi
		2arbo
		4arbr
		ar3dr
		ard5st
		a4rend
		arg5si
		2arh
		a1ri
		a4rigen
		ar3ka
		ark3lan
		ar5kr
		4arl
		4arn.
		ar4nal
		a1ro
		a2rob
		4arp
		ar2sa
		ar5skal
		arsk5l
		ar2sv
		ar4tro
		arts5p
		ar4tur
		4aru
		a4rur
		a5rus
		ar4väg
		a3ry
		a3rä
		2asa
		asbe4
		a1sc
		as2h
		asis5t
		as3kis
		a2sko
		a4skr
		as3ku
		as5l
		as3pa
		as3pig
		as2sk
		as2s5op
		as2sp
		as2st
		ass5up
		as3ta
		a5stard
		as5ter
		as5tiker
		asti5o
		as3to
		as4tr
		ast5rak
		a5stral
		ast3rol
		as5tör
		a3su
		a4sul
		a4sund
		as2ut
		as3v
		a1sy
		a2s5å
		a2sö
		a1t
		ata5ra
		a5te
		ati5ö
		a4tj
		a2tr
		a3tral
		4atrar
		a4t3re
		at3ria
		a3tric
		at3rie
		a5trik
		a3tris
		a3t4ro
		a4tro.
		at4ska
		1attac
		at2tak
		at4tj
		at4tos
		att3s
		a4tung
		2au
		au5b
		au2t5a
		3autom
		aut5s
		2a1va
		a4vart
		1avg
		2a1vi
		av3r
		4a3vä
		a5å
		1b2
		3ba
		ba4di
		ba4do
		bad3s4
		bak5l
		ba4ko
		ba4ku
		bank5l
		bas4ta
		ba5stu
		4bb
		b4bak
		b4batt
		bbb4
		bb3l
		bb4ler
		b4b3r
		bb4so
		4b3d
		3be
		be3d4r
		be5e
		be1k
		4beld
		be5lu
		be3ly
		be3lå
		be5lö
		beng4
		be3nå
		be1rö
		be1s
		be3sl
		bes5s
		be4sta
		be4ste
		be5su
		be3tr
		be3tv
		be3u
		4bex
		2b3f
		2b5h
		3bi
		bi3d4
		4binv
		bis3ko
		bi5skv
		b3je
		b3k
		b5lar
		b5lat
		ble4mo
		b5len
		5blera
		3bles
		5blid
		3blikr
		3bliks
		4b3m
		2b3n
		3bo
		bo4gr
		bo2kl
		bo1mu
		5bon
		bors5te
		bor4ti
		bort3r
		borts2
		bort3sl
		bo1s
		bo4sc
		boy5
		4b3p
		2b5raf
		4brar
		2b5rati
		3brik.
		b3rika
		3brike
		3briks
		b5rikö
		bru4st
		3bry
		3brö
		4b3s
		b5sce
		bs3ch
		b4slan
		b4sof
		b4sp
		bst4
		b4stj
		4b3t
		3bu
		bund4s
		bus2st
		b3v
		3by
		by5r
		3bå
		bång3
		båt2s
		3bä
		3bö
		bör2s
		c2
		5cap
		c3c
		1c4e
		cens3t
		3centr
		ceu4s
		4ch.
		3chau
		3chef
		5choc
		4cht
		chäs3
		chör4
		1ci
		ci4lu
		cim2
		cipp4
		4ck
		c3ka
		c3ke
		c3ki
		ck5j
		ck1l
		ck5lis
		ck3n
		c3ko
		c4kordn
		ck3org
		c4kort
		ck3r
		ck4re
		ck3sla
		ckus2
		ck3va
		ck3ve
		ck3vä
		ck5ä
		ck3ö
		cle2a
		co2a
		co4m
		4cr
		cros2
		4cs
		1cy
		1d
		3da
		5da.
		4dadr
		dags3
		2dak
		5dako
		da3li
		5dam
		da3må
		4dand.
		4d1ap
		4darb
		4dart
		da4tr
		dat5t
		4dax
		2db
		4dc
		dcen3
		2dd
		ddd4
		ddi4s
		d3dj
		d4dos
		dd3ra
		dd3re
		dd3ri
		d3drä
		dd2s
		dds3v
		3d2e
		de1k4
		4deko
		4deld
		del2sa
		dels5ti
		de5lut
		d4en
		denti5ö
		den2to
		de3pr
		5der
		der1k
		de2ro
		de5rol
		der5sti
		de4ru
		de2s
		de3se
		de3sp
		des3ti
		d4et
		de3tr
		4dex
		2d1f
		dfö3ra
		2d1g
		d3gl
		2d5h
		3di
		dias4
		di5el
		di2gr
		di3ka
		di5ku
		4dinf
		din3g4o
		4dinr
		4dins
		2dinsp
		4dint
		di1o
		di4od
		di3sc
		di4sj
		dis3ko
		dis1kr
		dis1p
		dis5to
		dis3tra
		di4tre
		2dj
		d3jor
		djup5p
		3djur
		2d3k2
		4d5l
		2d1m
		2d1n
		3do
		d2ol
		do5lo
		4domr
		dom2sk
		5don
		do4pak
		4d5ord
		4dori
		4dort
		d5ost
		do3y
		2d1p
		2d2r2
		d3rad
		3d4rag
		d3rand
		d5rarb
		d5rassera
		d5ratu
		3drej
		d3ren
		5dres
		d3ret
		d4ric
		3drif
		d3rig
		4d5rik
		d3rin
		3d4riv
		d5roc
		3dropp
		d3ror
		4drot
		drotts3
		d3räkn
		3dräkt
		5drän
		d3rät
		d5röd
		4ds
		d2s1an
		d2se
		ds5enh
		d4sf
		d2si
		ds3ins
		d2sj
		dsk2
		d3skef
		ds4ken
		d3ski
		ds3kl
		ds5kn
		ds1l
		ds4lot
		ds4mo
		d4små
		ds5nå
		d2so
		ds3pl
		ds3s4
		ds3tal
		d5stat
		ds4te
		dste4a
		d5stig
		ds3tin
		ds5tro
		d2su
		ds1v
		d2sö
		2d3t
		3du
		dub3ble
		4dup
		du1s
		du2sc
		du4ste
		du5sö
		4dut
		du4vu
		2d1v
		d3vr
		2d3w
		3dy
		dy4kan
		dy4ro
		4dz
		5dåg
		2dås
		4dåt
		4däg
		dä2r
		3dö
		döds1
		4dög
		4döp
		d5öst
		dé4
		e1a
		e2ake
		e4am
		4eb
		e2br
		eb3ril
		4ec
		e3ch
		echiff5
		ecis4
		e3co
		e2d
		e4dans
		edd4r
		edi4u
		ed3j
		e5dral
		ed1sk
		ed2sko
		ed3s2l
		edso4
		e3då
		e1e
		e2ed
		e4ei
		ee2k5
		e4en.
		e4ene
		e1f
		ef4s
		3efte
		e1g
		e3ga
		e3ge
		ege2l
		eg1l
		eg2ler
		e3glera
		e5gleri
		e4gran
		eg5rat
		eg3rin
		e5gru
		egs3
		e5gå
		eig2
		ei5gn
		e3ik
		e1in
		ei5sh
		e1isk
		e1jo
		e3ju
		e3jä
		e5jö
		e3ka
		e1ki
		e1kl
		ek3lat
		ek4le
		ek3n
		e1ko
		ekord5s
		ek3orr
		ek4ret.
		ek5ro
		e1ku
		e1kve
		ek5vis
		e1ky
		e1kä
		e1la
		el1akt
		el4arb
		3eld.
		eleb3r
		elekt3ri
		el4fra
		eli5ku
		el3k4
		el3li
		ell3s
		el3lä
		e1lo
		e4lob
		el3p
		el2si
		el5ug
		e5luv
		2e1lä
		e1m
		e5mat
		e5mis
		emon1s
		em5ort
		emp5le
		en5art
		e2nav
		en4ce
		e4ned
		e4nek
		ene3rö
		2enj
		en5klo
		en3kn
		en5kr
		en5kä
		enning5
		ennings2
		eno2m
		en3si
		ens5ke
		ens2m
		en2sp
		ens4te
		ens4vin
		en4så
		ent4ha
		en2t1r
		ent4rat.
		ent3rati
		ent3ri
		ent5ru
		e5nus
		2eny
		2e1nä
		e1o
		e2og
		eo4i
		e5or
		2ep
		e1pe
		e1pi
		e3pla
		ep5le
		epp2s3
		epps5t
		e1pr
		ep3s
		ep4tr
		epu3b
		e3på
		er1ak
		4eras
		er3d4
		erg4l
		er4gu
		er4gås
		e1ri
		e5rib
		e4rinf
		erings3
		eri5stik
		erk4lin
		erlä4
		er5na
		e1ro
		e3rob
		e2rom
		erp4
		er3ra
		er5sc
		ers4ken
		er3sl
		ers4le
		er4sta
		er2ste
		er3str
		er3sv
		e1ru
		e5rum
		e3ry
		e5råd
		e1rä
		e2sal
		es5all
		es3arm
		e1sc
		2ese
		es4hi
		esi4u
		es2k
		e4skan
		es5kar
		e4s3ken
		es3ker
		es5kul
		e1sl
		e5slag
		es2mi
		e1sp
		es3pl
		es2sk
		ess5lä
		es2st
		e3stal
		es5ten.
		esti2ge
		es3tin
		es5tor.
		es4tr
		est5rer
		e3stru
		est4rö
		e3stå
		es2u
		e1sy
		eta3b
		e5ti
		eti3ö
		e1to
		e5tri.
		et3ris
		e5trä
		et2s
		ets2ad
		ets3kr
		ets1l
		ets3m
		ets5pa
		et4sv
		ett3r
		e1tu
		etu4ri
		et4va
		et5vu
		e1ty
		2etz
		e1tä
		etäc4
		euk4
		e5um.
		e5up4
		4eur
		eu4se.
		eu5tro
		e1v
		e4varm
		e4vj
		ev3r
		3exp
		ext4r
		4eä
		f2
		3fa
		fac4
		fac5ke
		4fans
		4farb
		fa3sh
		fa4st
		fa4tö
		4fav
		4f3b
		f3d
		3fe
		4fef
		fe2l
		fes5ta
		fe3sto
		4fex
		2f1f
		fff4
		ff3l
		ff3n
		f3fo
		ff3r
		ffs4
		f3fä
		ffö5re
		f3g2
		f5h
		3fi
		fi2br
		fib5rig
		fi3li
		fin5sm
		fi3skal
		fisk3r
		fi2ti
		2f3k
		1fl
		flo4da
		4f3m
		fma4
		1fo
		4fof
		fol2
		folk1
		2f5om
		fo2na
		for4mo
		fost3r
		4f3p
		fra2m
		fram5p
		f4rer
		5freri
		fre4s
		f4ri.
		fri5sp
		5frit
		fros5ta
		fru5str
		från5
		2f3s
		fs2k
		f4sl
		f4sm
		f4sn
		f4sp
		f4st
		f4sv
		2ft
		f3ta
		f4taf
		f4tak
		f4tap
		f4tarm
		fte4r
		f4tex
		f3ti
		f4tin
		f3to
		f4t3r
		ft2sa
		ft4set
		ft2s5i
		ft4sj
		fts4t
		fts5vä
		ft5t
		ft1v
		3fu
		furs5te
		fu5ru
		fu3tu
		4fv
		5fy
		fy4ma
		få3tö
		1fä
		fäs5ti
		3fö
		fö2ra
		fö2ren
		fö2ri
		för3k
		för3sm
		för3su
		fört4
		för1ö
		ga5br
		3g2ag
		4gakt
		3g2al
		gall3s
		ga5lä
		ga4no
		2garb
		4garm
		ga2ro
		4gart
		ga4st
		ga4su
		5g2ati
		gaus4
		g4av
		g5avsn
		4gax
		2gb
		2gd
		g3d4r
		ge2a
		ge5b4
		2gef
		2ge4j
		g2eli
		3gelis
		gel5st
		gel5y
		3gelä
		gel5än
		g4em
		ge4nap
		gen5g
		3g2eni
		3genj
		4genm
		genom5
		gen4sa
		g4ense
		1g2ent
		4genv
		ge5ny
		3genä
		ge2o
		1g2era
		4gerarb
		3g2eri
		gers5n
		5gese
		ge4to
		get5s
		5g2ett
		2g1f
		2gg
		g1ga
		g4gap
		g1ge
		gg5g
		gg1l
		g4gos
		ggs4la
		ggs4m
		gg3s4t
		gg3s4v
		g4gu
		2gh
		gh4te
		1g2i
		gi1o
		gi5sn
		gi4ste
		gis4tr
		gi5stral
		gi5st4rat
		3giv
		gi2ö
		g2jo
		3gjor
		g3jä
		2g3k2
		2gl
		g4lans
		g1lar
		g2las
		5glase
		glas5k
		5glasö
		g4lid
		4glj
		g4lög
		5glöm
		2g1m
		2g1n
		g4nag
		g2no
		1g2o
		3go.
		3gol
		gon3s4
		4gont
		2gord
		4gorm
		4gort
		go3sl
		2g1p
		g2r4
		3graf
		5gral
		gra2m5
		5grans
		4gras
		5grec
		5grett
		g3rig
		4g5rik
		5grip
		3gris
		g5roi
		gro2v
		4grum
		grus5t
		g4rå
		5grå.
		grä4n
		5gräns
		2g2s
		gs1an
		g5satt
		g3sel
		g4sf
		gsi4d
		g3sju
		g5skaf
		gs4ki
		gs3kn
		gs4kot
		g3sky
		gs1l
		gs1m
		g4sme
		gs3n
		gs4ni
		gs4nö
		gs1or
		gs3pl
		gs3po
		gs4por
		gs5pre
		gs3pu
		gs3s
		gs3tak
		gs3tal
		g3stark
		gs4ten
		g3stif
		gs3till
		gs3tj
		g3stol
		gs3tra
		gst4re
		g3stäm
		g4sug
		gs1v
		g4s3ve
		gs3vi
		gs3vå
		gs3yt
		gs1ä
		2g1t
		g3tr
		1g2u
		4gug
		guld3
		gul4da
		4gulä
		gu2ma
		4gup
		gu5ru
		gus4k
		2gut
		g3utb
		2g1v
		4gw
		3gy
		gytt3j
		1g2å
		gårds5
		2g5åri
		g4äl
		g2är
		gä4s
		1g2ö
		4gög
		gö5ro
		2g5ört
		1h
		ha3bl
		ha5ge
		ha4li
		hal4so
		halv3å
		ham4st
		handels3
		hands4l
		han5g2a
		ha5ra
		ha4sc
		ha4sp
		hasp5l
		has3t
		hav2
		havs3
		h5c
		4hd
		he4at
		he4fr
		he4lä
		hets1
		hets3t
		hets3v
		h3g
		h2i
		4hir
		his2sk
		hi4t
		hjäl3s
		h1k
		2hl
		h4le
		2hm
		4hn
		h2na
		h2nit
		ho5nu
		hop5plo
		hop3s
		hos3p
		hos5ti
		4how
		h3p
		h5ru
		h1s
		2ht
		hu2s
		hust5r
		hyg5r
		hys4t
		hys5ta
		hy3ster
		hård5s4
		häll2
		hälls1
		hälso3
		hä4ri
		hä4s
		hä4var
		h2ö
		hö2g
		hö5gen
		hög5r
		hörn5s
		hö4s
		höst5r
		i1a
		ia3fr
		ia3g
		ia4lu
		ia4sk
		ia3tr
		i2b3l
		i5bril
		i3ca
		i4ce.
		i5cha
		ic4kord
		ick3u4
		i5co
		i2d
		iden3s
		id4ge
		i4dom
		id1r
		id3ro
		id2s
		ids3v
		i4dun
		i3då
		i4dö
		2i1e
		ifes4
		i5fn
		i1fr
		3ifrån
		i1g
		4igan
		i2geb
		ig5ej
		ig1l
		ig3no
		i3i
		i4kart
		i1ki
		i3klo
		ik5län
		ik3n
		i1ko
		ik3re
		i5krob
		ik5rof
		ik5ros
		ik5s2h
		ik5skor
		i3kul
		i3kum
		ik5u4t
		ik1v
		i3ky
		i3kå
		i3kö
		i1la
		il4dan
		i2lin
		il1jö
		il5k
		il5lak
		il4lik
		ill3s2
		3illu
		il5lär
		il2min
		i1lo
		il2tj
		i3lu
		ilufts5
		i4lup
		i5lä
		im2b3r
		im5sm
		im4so
		i1mu
		i5må
		i3mä
		i5mö
		i4nau
		ind5skä
		ind5sti
		1indu
		in4ga
		in4ge.
